Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4003
Intent and purpose of act.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that the producers of grain sorghum be permitted and encouraged to develop, carry out, and participate in programs of research, education, market development, and promotion. It is the purpose of sections 2-4001 to 2-4020 to provide the authorization and to prescribe the necessary procedures whereby grain sorghum producers in this state may finance programs to achieve the purposes expressed in this section.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 3.